en: reindeer
da: rensdyr
de: ren
es: reno
fi: poro
fr: renne
hr: sob
it: Renna
la: Rangifer tarandus (Reindeer)
nb: rein
pl: ren
sv: ren

en: reindeer meat
de: Rentierfleisch
fi: poronliha
fr: viande de renne
hr: meso sobova
it: carne di renna
sv: renkött

en: reindeer shoulder
de: Rentierschulter
fi: poron lapa
fr: épaule de renne
hr: plećka sobova
it: spalla di renna
sv: renbog

en: wild boar, boar
de: Wildschwein
fr: sanglier
hr: divlji vepar
it: cinghiale
pl: dzik, dzika

en: wild boar meat
fr: viande de sanglier
hr: meso divlje svinje
it: carne di cinghiale
pl: mięso z dzika

en: horse
af: perd
am: ፈረስ
an: equus caballus
ar: خيل
as: ঘোঁৰা
av: чу
ay: kawallu
az: ev atı
ba: йорт аты
be: конь свойскі
bg: кон
bi: horse
bn: ঘোড়া
bo: རྟ།
br: marc'h
bs: konj
ca: cavall
co: cavaddu
cs: kůň
cv: килти лаша
cy: ceffyl
da: hest
de: hauspferd
el: άλογο
eo: ĉevalo
es: equus ferus caballus
et: hobune
eu: zaldi
fa: اسب
fi: hevonen
fj: ose
fo: ross
fr: cheval
fy: hynder
ga: capall
gd: each
gl: cabalo
gn: kavaju
gu: ઘોડો
gv: cabbyl
he: סוס הבית
hi: घोड़ा
hr: domaći konj
ht: cheval
hu: ló
hy: ձի
ia: cavallo
id: kuda
ik: tuttuqpak
io: kavalo
is: hestur
it: equus ferus caballus
ja: ウマ
jv: jaran
ka: შინაური ცხენი
kk: жылқы
kn: ಕುದುರೆ
ko: 말
ks: گُر
ku: hesp
kv: вӧв
kw: margh
ky: жылкы
la: equus ferus caballus
li: taam peerd
ln: farása
lo: ມ້າ
lt: naminis arklys
lv: mājas zirgs
mg: soavaly
mk: коњ
ml: കുതിര
mn: адуу
mr: घोडा
ms: kuda
mt: żiemel
my: မြင်း
nb: hest
ne: घोडा
nl: paard
nn: hest
nv: łį́į́ʼ
oc: equus caballus
or: ଘୋଡ଼ା
os: бæх
pa: ਘੋੜਾ
pl: koń
ps: آس
pt: cavalo
qu: kawallu
rm: chaval
ro: cal
ru: домашняя лошадь
rw: ifarashi
sa: अश्वः
sc: caddu
sd: گهوڙو
se: heabuš
sg: mbarata
sh: domaći konj
sk: kôň
sl: domači konj
sm: solofanua
sn: bhiza
so: faras
sq: kali
sr: домаћи коњ
su: kuda
sv: häst
sw: farasi
ta: குதிரை
te: గుర్రము
tg: асп
th: ม้า
tl: kabayo
tr: at
tt: йорт аты
ug: ئات
uk: кінь свійський
ur: گھوڑا
uz: ot (hayvon)
vi: ngựa
vo: jevod
wa: tchivå
wo: fas w
yi: פערד
yo: ẹṣin
za: max
zh: 马

en: horse meat
ar: لحم خيل
az: at əti
bg: конско месо, конско
cs: koňské maso
de: pferdefleisch
el: κρέας αλόγου
eo: ĉevalaĵo
es: carne de caballo
et: hobuseliha
fa: گوشت اسب
fi: hevosenliha
fr: viande de cheval
hr: konjsko meso
hy: ձիու միս
id: daging kuda
it: carne di cavallo
ja: 馬肉
kk: жылқы еті
ko: 말고기
ms: daging kuda
nl: paardenvlees
pl: konina
pt: carne equina
ru: конина
sk: konské mäso
sv: hästkött
tr: at eti
uk: конина
uz: qazi
vi: thịt ngựa
zh: 马肉

en: patty, patties
fi: pihvi
fr: steak
hr: pljeskavica
id: patty
it: patty
jv: patty

en: meat patty
ca: filet mòlt, stick tartar
de: hacksteak
el: μπιφτέκι
es: filete picado stick tartar
fi: jauhelihapihvi
fr: steak haché
ga: spíosbhurgair
hr: mesna pljeskavica
it: polpetta di carne
ko: 패티
nl: runderhamburger

fr: Steak haché pur boeuf, pure viande de boeuf hachée, viande hachée pur bœuf
ca: stick tartar de vedella, stick tartar de res, filet mòlt de vedella, filet mòlt de res
da: pandebøf
es: stick tartar de ternera, stick tartar de res, filete picado de ternera, filete picado de res
fi: naudan jauhelihapihvi
sv: pannbiff

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 5% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 5% de matières grasses
hr: kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 5% masti

en: Raw minced beef steak with 5% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cru à 5% de matières grasses
hr: sirovi mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 5% masti

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 10% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 10% de matières grasses
hr: kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 10% masti

en: Raw minced beef steak with 10% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cru à 10% de matières grasses
hr: sirovi mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 10% masti

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 15% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 15% de matières grasses
hr: kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 15% masti

en: Raw minced beef steak with 15% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cru à 15% de matières grasses
hr: sirovi mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 15% masti

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 20% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 20% de matières grasses
hr: kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 20% masti

en: goat
bg: Коза
de: Ziege
es: cabra
fr: Chèvre
hr: jarac
pt: Cabra

en: goat meat
an: aponkye
ar: لحم الماعز
bg: козе месо
bs: Kozetina
ca: carn de cabra, carn de cabrit
da: gedekød
de: Ziegenfleisch
eo: Kapraĵo
es: cabrito al pastor
fi: vuohenliha
fr: viande de chèvre
hr: kozje meso
hu: kecskehús
id: Daging kambing
it: carne di capra
ja: ヤギ肉
ko: 염소고기
la: Haedina
ms: Daging kambing
nl: geitenvlees, geitevlees
pt: carne de cabra
ru: Козлятина
sr: јаретина
ta: ஆட்டிறைச்சி
vi: Thịt dê
zh: 山羊肉

en: young goat, Raw young goat
fr: Chevreau cru
hr: mlada koza
it: capretto